Washington statutes.
RCW 43.180.220

Housing finance program—Mortgage financing—Investments—Flexible loan underwriting guidelines.

The commission, in cooperation with the *department of community, trade, and economic development, and the state investment board, shall develop and implement a housing finance program that:

(1) Provides subsidized or unsubsidized mortgage financing for single-family homeownership, including a single condominium unit, located in the state of Washington;

(2) Requests the state investment board to make investments, within its policies and investment guidelines, in mortgage-backed securities that are collateralized by loans made within the state of Washington; and

(3) Provides flexible loan underwriting guidelines, including but not limited to provisions that will allow reduced downpayment requirements for the purchaser.

[ 1994 c 235 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "department of community, trade, and economic development" was renamed the "department of commerce" by 2009 c 565.

Severability—1994 c 235: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1994 c 235 s 4.]